Hawaii statutes.
§607-14.7 Attorney's fees, costs, and
expenses; judgment creditors. In addition to any other attorney's fees,
costs, and expenses, which may or are required to be awarded, and
notwithstanding any law to the contrary, the court in any civil action may award
to a judgment creditor, from a judgment debtor, reasonable attorney's fees,
costs, and expenses incurred by the judgment creditor in obtaining or
attempting to obtain satisfaction of a money judgment, whether by execution,
examination of judgment debtor, garnishment, or otherwise. The court may award
attorney's fees that it determines are reasonable, but shall not award fees in
excess of the following schedule:

(1) Twenty-five per cent on the first $1,000 or
fraction thereof;

(2) Twenty per cent on the second $1,000 or fraction
thereof;

(3) Fifteen per cent on the third $1,000 or fraction
thereof;

(4) Ten per cent on the fourth $1,000 or fraction
thereof;

(5) Five per cent on the fifth $1,000 or fraction
thereof; and

(6) 2.5 per cent on any amount in excess of $5,000.

The fees shall be assessed on the amount of
judgment, exclusive of costs and all other attorney's fees. [L 1985, c 288, §2;
am L 2016, c 55, §22]

Previous
Vol13_Ch0601-0676
Next